Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.30.060

Career connected learning account.

The career connected learning account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from public or private sources provided for the purpose of funding grants under RCW 28C.30.050 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for career connected learning grants.

[ 2019 c 406 s 59.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.